California statutes. Education Code
(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the governing board of a school district, pursuant to the terms of an agreement with an employee organization under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, from delegating its authority to determine whether sufficient cause exists for disciplinary action against classified employees, excluding peace officers as defined in Section 830.32 of the Penal Code, to an impartial third-party hearing officer. However, the governing board of the school district shall retain authority to review the determination under the standards set forth in Section 1286.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), a permanent employee who timely requests a hearing on charges against the employee shall not be suspended without pay, suspended with a reduction in pay, demoted with a reduction in pay, or dismissed before a decision is rendered after the hearing, unless the governing board, or an impartial third-party hearing officer provided pursuant to the terms of an agreement with an employee
 organization under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, finds that at the time discipline was imposed at the conclusion of the review process specified in Skelly v. State Personnel Bd. (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194, the employer demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee engaged in criminal
 misconduct, misconduct that presents a risk of harm to pupils, staff, or property, or committed habitual violations of the district’s policies or regulations.

(2) If a hearing on the charges will be conducted by an impartial third-party hearing officer or the governing board pursuant to subdivision (e), the school district may stop paying a permanent employee before a decision is rendered after 30 calendar days from the date the hearing is requested.

(3) To the extent that this subdivision conflicts
 with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2023, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall not apply to the school district until the expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(g) (1) A governing board of a school district shall delegate its authority to a judge, as defined in Section 44990, to determine whether sufficient cause exists for disciplinary action against a classified employee involving allegations of egregious misconduct, as defined in Section 44932, and involving a minor, as defined in Section 44990. The judge’s ruling shall be binding upon all parties.

(2) A judge authorized under this subdivision to conduct a hearing involving allegations as described in Section 44010 or 44011, or as described in Sections 11165.2 to 11165.6, inclusive, of the Penal Code, shall conduct that hearing in accordance with Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 44990) of Chapter 4 and Section 49077.

(3) The term “representative of the respondent,” within the meaning of Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 44990) of Chapter 4, shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, an exclusive labor representative.

(h) This section applies only to school districts not incorporating the merit system as outlined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(i) To the extent that this section, as amended by Chapter 542 of the Statutes of 2019, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2020, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Chapter 542 of the Statutes of 2019 shall not apply to the school district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   (AB 2413)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45114.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45113, the governing board may lay off and reemploy classified employees only in accordance with procedures provided by Sections 45298 and 45308, except the term “personnel commission” therein shall be construed to mean the governing board. “Governing board” as used in this section shall include districts governed by a common board or by different boards but with a common administration. Employees in common board or common administration districts shall, for the purpose of layoff for lack of work or funds, be considered as having been employed in a single district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45115.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who was subject to being, or was in fact, laid off for lack of work or lack of funds and who elected service retirement from the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be placed on an appropriate reemployment list. The district shall notify the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of the fact that retirement was due to layoff for lack of work or of funds. If he is subsequently subject to reemployment and accepts, in writing, the appropriate vacant position, the district shall maintain the vacancy until the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System has properly processed his request for reinstatement from retirement.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45116.

A notice of disciplinary action shall contain a statement in ordinary and concise language of the specific acts and omissions upon which the disciplinary action is based, a statement of the cause for the action taken and, if it is claimed that an employee has violated a rule or regulation of the public school employer, such rule or regulation shall be set forth in said notice.

A notice of disciplinary action stating one or more causes or grounds for disciplinary action established by any rule, regulation, or statute in the language of the rule, regulation, or statute, is insufficient for any purpose.

A proceeding may be brought by, or on behalf of, the employee to restrain any further proceedings under any notice of disciplinary action violative of this provision.

This section shall apply to proceedings conducted under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45117.

(a) (1) No later than March 15 and before a classified employee is given notice by the governing board of a school district that the employee’s services will not be required for the ensuing year due to lack of work or lack of funds, the governing board of the school district and the employee shall be given written notice by the superintendent of the school district or the superintendent’s designee, or, in the case of a school district that has no superintendent, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the school district, that it has been recommended that the notice be given to the employee, stating the reasons that the employee’s services will not be required for the ensuing year, and informing the employee of the employee’s displacement rights, if any, and reemployment rights.

(2) Until the classified employee has requested a hearing as provided in subdivision (b) or has waived their right to a hearing, the notice and the reasons for the notice shall be confidential and shall not be divulged by any person, except as may be necessary in the performance of duties. However, a violation of this requirement of confidentiality, in and of itself, shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the validity of a hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) A classified employee may request a hearing to determine if there is cause for not reemploying the employee for the ensuing year. A request for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the person who sent the notice, on or before a date specified in subdivision (a), which shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the notice is served upon the employee. If an employee fails to
 request a hearing on or before the date specified, the employee’s failure to do so shall constitute a waiver of the employee’s right to a hearing. The notice provided for in subdivision (a) shall advise the employee of the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) If a hearing is requested by a classified employee under subdivision (b), the proceeding shall be conducted and a decision made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the governing board of a school district shall have all the power granted to an agency in that chapter, except that all of the following shall apply:

(1) The respondent shall file their notice of participation, if any, within five days after service upon the respondent of the District Statement of Reduction in Force and the respondent shall be notified of this five-day period for
 filing in the District Statement of Reduction in Force.

(2) The discovery authorized by Section 11507.6 of the Government Code shall be available only if a request is made for discovery within 15 days after service of the District Statement of Reduction in Force, and the notice required by Section 11505 of the Government Code shall so indicate.

(3) (A) The hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge who shall prepare a proposed decision, containing findings of fact and a determination as to whether the charges sustained by the evidence are related to the welfare of the schools and the pupils of the schools. The proposed decision shall be prepared for the governing board of the school district and shall contain a determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and a recommendation as to disposition. However, the governing board of the school
 district shall make the final determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and disposition. None of the findings, recommendations, or determinations contained in the proposed decision prepared by the administrative law judge shall be binding on the governing board of the school district. Nonsubstantive procedural errors committed by the school district or governing board of the school district shall not constitute cause for dismissing the charges unless the errors are prejudicial errors. Copies of the proposed decision shall be submitted to the governing board of the school district and to the classified employee on or before May 7 of the year in which the proceeding is commenced. All expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be paid by the governing board of the school district from school district funds. Any notice or request shall be deemed sufficient when it is delivered in person to the employee to whom it is directed, or when it is deposited in the United
 States registered mail, postage prepaid, and addressed to the last known address of the employee. Notice of termination shall be given to the employee before May 15. If a continuance was granted after a request for hearing was made, the deadlines described in this section shall be extended for the number of days of that continuance.

(B) For purposes of this section, “cause” for layoff includes school district compliance with the seniority requirements of this code, including Section 45308.

(4) An employee may be represented at a hearing by an attorney or by a nonattorney representative of the employee organization designated as the exclusive representative of the employees in the employee’s classification, if any.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, or any other law, during the time period between five days after the enactment of an annual Budget Act and August 15 of the fiscal year to which that Budget Act applies, if the governing board of a school district determines that its total local control funding formula apportionment per unit of average daily attendance for the fiscal year of that Budget Act has not increased by at least 2 percent, and if the governing board of a school district determines it is therefore necessary to decrease the number of classified employees of the school district due to lack of work or lack of funds, the governing board of the school district may issue a District Statement of Reduction in Force to those employees in accordance with a schedule of notice and hearing to be adopted by the governing board of the school district.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be inoperative
 during any period that Section 44955.5 is inoperative as it applies to certificated employees.

(e) (1) If a permanent classified employee is not given the notices and a right to a hearing as provided for in this section, the employee shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing school year, except that nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the right of a district to release probationary employees who never become permanent without notice or hearing.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “permanent employee” includes an employee who was permanent at the time the notice or right to a hearing was required and an employee who became permanent after the date of the required notice.

(f) (1) A classified employee shall not be laid off if a short-term employee
 is retained to render a service that the classified employee is qualified to render. This subdivision does not create a layoff notice requirement for any individual hired as a short-term employee, as defined in Section 45103, for a period not exceeding 60 days.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the retention of a short-term employee, as defined in Section 45103, who is hired for a period not exceeding 60 days after which the short-term service may not be extended or renewed.

(g) Notwithstanding the other requirements of this code respecting layoff of permanent classified employees, when classified positions must be eliminated as a result of the expiration of a specially funded program, the employees to be laid off shall be given written notice not less than 60 days prior to the effective date of their layoff informing them of their layoff date and their displacement rights,
 if any, and reemployment rights.

(h) If, after January 1, 2021, the Legislature provides certificated employees with any additional rights to notice or hearing as to layoffs, then permanent classified employees and those who become permanent classified employees shall be afforded the same rights by the school district.

(i) The governing board of the school district may adopt from time to time rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(j) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 27.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

45118.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Labor Commissioner, representatives of employee organizations, and representatives of voluntary local educational agencies, including, but not limited to, members of governing boards of school districts, shall convene the Classified Employee Staffing Ratio Workgroup on or before July 31, 2025.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “voluntary
 local educational agencies” means school districts, county offices of education, community college districts, and special education local plan areas electing to participate in the workgroup.

(b) (1) (A) The workgroup shall group classified assignments, for both K–12 and community colleges, in a manner that reflects the environmental setting of the assignment, the type of work to be completed, the impact on the assignment made by enrollment at a schoolsite or campus, specialized needs, including certifications or licenses, and other reasonable factors.

(B) The groupings may include, but are not necessarily limited to, the categories of food service, maintenance and operations, office and technical services, paraeducators, special services, including
 law enforcement, and transportation services.

(2) The workgroup shall recommend staffing ratios per grouping identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The workgroup shall take into account the physical, mental, and emotional impact of a pandemic or other emergency environment on workers.

(4) The staffing ratios shall compare the number of classified staff needed for each group with the number of pupils, or students, as applicable. The staffing ratio may compare other factors, as relevant to the group of classified workers.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the workgroup shall, on or before
 July 31, 2026, report recommendations on appropriate staffing ratios for classified employees in schools and community colleges to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (AB 2971)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

45119.

Whenever, by reason of any reorganization, other than the unification of districts, all or part of the territory of any school district which has adopted the merit system is included within any district, or in any new district, the governing board of the acquiring or new district shall adopt such merit system if a simple majority of the classified employees of the reorganized district voting on the adoption of a merit system approve its adoption pursuant to Section 45221. If no such election is requested by the classified employees of the reorganized district pursuant to Section 45221, adoption of a merit system shall be effective only if the number of classified employees from the merit system district who are to become employees of the acquiring district equals or exceeds the number of classified employees of the acquiring nonmerit system district. In the event that any district simultaneously acquires all or part of the territory of two or more districts which have previously adopted the merit system, the governing board of the acquiring or new district shall adopt a merit system containing such provisions as are necessary to afford to all employees the rights guaranteed by this section if a simple majority of the classified employees of the reorganized district voting on the adoption of a merit system approve its adoption pursuant to Section 45221. If no such election is requested by the classified employees of the reorganized district pursuant to Section 45221, adoption of a merit system shall be effective only if the number of classified employees from the merit system district who are to become employees of the acquiring district equals or exceeds the number of classified employees of the acquiring nonmerit system district. The employees of the reorganized or new district shall retain all rights and privileges as if they had been employed under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter, with seniority commencing as of the date of original employment in their original district. Where there are more than a sufficient number of employees for a given classification under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter, such personnel shall be retained in employment for a period of not less than two years as if the reorganization had not occurred but without prejudice to the powers of the personnel commission and governing board of the reorganized district to reasonably reassign such persons. If at the expiration of such period, upon a finding made by the personnel commission that there are excess personnel in any given classification, such personnel shall, if the governing board so directs, be placed upon appropriate reemployment lists for 39 months and, if so placed, shall be offered and may accept positions of lower rank in their line of promotion in the order of seniority as established by this section in accordance with rules drawn in compliance with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of the chapter. The acceptance of a position in lower rank in accordance herewith shall not be deemed to constitute a waiver of the right to reemployment at the original level should a vacancy at such level occur within the period mentioned in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

45120.

If all or any part of any district or districts which is unified with all or any part of a district, has, or have, the merit system prior to the date of the reorganization election, all employees not legally requiring certification qualifications of the reorganized district shall be employed in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter if a simple majority of the classified employees of the reorganized district voting on the adoption of a merit system approve its adoption pursuant to Section 45221. If no such election is requested by the classified employees of the reorganized district pursuant to Section 45221, adoption of a merit system shall be effective only if the number of classified employees from the merit system district who are to become employees of the acquiring district equals or exceeds the number of classified employees of the acquiring nonmerit system district. If on the date of such reorganization election, two or more of the said defined districts of such reorganized district have merit systems, the reorganized district shall adopt a single merit system which shall contain all provisions necessary to secure to all employees the rights guaranteed by Section 45121 of this code.

Seniority of the personnel of the reorganized district shall be established as of the date of original employment in the district or districts as defined above. Where there are more than a sufficient number of employees for a given classification under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter, such personnel shall be retained in employment for a period of not less than two years as if the reorganization had not occurred but without prejudice to the powers of the personnel commission and the governing board of the new unified district to reasonably reassign such person. If at the expiration of such period, upon a finding made by the personnel commission that there are excess personnel in any given classification, such personnel shall, if the governing board so directs, be placed upon appropriate reemployment lists for 39 months, and shall, if so placed, be offered and may accept positions of lower rank in their line of promotion in the order of seniority as established by this section in accordance with rules drawn in compliance with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter. The acceptance of a position in lower rank in accordance herewith shall not be deemed to constitute a waiver of the right to reemployment at the original level should a vacancy at such level occur within the period mentioned in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

45120.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 45119 and 45120, when any school district involved in any reorganization, annexation, unionization, merger, or unification is not required to adopt the merit system, the classified employees of such district who formerly were employed by a district having the merit system shall retain for a period of two years the salary, benefits, seniority, and other rights which they would have had had the reorganization not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

45120.2.

(a) If the development or revision of a local plan for the education of individuals with exceptional needs pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 56195) of Part 30, results in a classified employee who is performing service for one employer being terminated, reassigned, or transferred, or becoming the employee of another employer because of the reorganization of special education programs, the employee shall retain the seniority acquired at his or her employment with the school district or county office of education from which he or she was terminated, reassigned, or transferred. If terminated, the employee retains the rights specified in Sections 45115, 45117, and 45119.

(b) The reassignment of an employee, transfer of an employee, or new employment of an employee caused by the reorganization of special education programs does not affect the seniority or classification that a classified employee already attained in any school district that undergoes the reorganization. The employee has the same status with respect to his or her seniority or classification, with the new employer, including time served as a probationary employee. The total number of years served as a classified employee with the former school district or county office shall be credited, year for year, for placement on the salary schedule of the new school district or county office.

(c) If a local plan for the education of individuals with exceptional needs is developed or revised pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 56195) of Part 30, all classified employees shall be employed by a county office of education or an individual school district.

(d) A classified employee who is reassigned or transferred as a result of the reorganization of special education programs has priority, except as provided in subdivision (e), in being informed of and in filling classified positions in the classifications in which the employee was employed before the reassignment or transfer. This priority expires 24 months after the date of reassignment or transfer and may be waived by the employee during that time period.

(e) A classified employee who served in a special education program in a school district or county office and is terminated from his or her employment by that school district or county office pursuant to Section 45114 as a result of the reorganization of a special education program has first priority in being informed of and in filling vacant classified positions for which the employee is qualified or was employed, in the county office or school district that operates the reorganized special education program. Permanent employees have the first priority right to reappointment as provided in this section for 39 months from the date of termination. Probationary employees have the first priority right to reappointment as provided in this section for 24 months from the date of termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

45121.

Persons employed in positions not requiring certification qualifications in districts, all or part of whose territory is included in a unification of districts, shall continue as employees of the unified school district for not less than two years, and shall not, by reason of any unification, be deprived of any benefit which they would have had had the unification not taken place. In determining the rights of such employees, their salaries, accumulated leaves, and other rights shall be determined as of the date the unification election was conducted. No increase in benefits not previously conferred, granted by the governing board of any district, all or part of whose territory is included in a unification of districts, after such unification election, shall be binding on the governing board of the unified district, except that benefits granted in the districts comprising the new unified district which does not become effective until the second succeeding first day of July shall be binding on the governing board of the unified district. Nothing herein contained shall preclude the governing board of the unified school district from making any reasonable reassignment of the duties of such employees. The governing board of the unified district shall establish a system of uniform salaries, employee benefits and working conditions for employees performing like services in conformity with the provisions of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45122.

Whenever a governing board of a school district requires a physical examination to be taken by a classified employee or employees, either by rule or by its direction or the direction of its authorized district administrator; or when classified employees are required by law to submit to a physical examination for continuance in employment, the board shall either provide the required examination, cause it to be provided, or provide the employee with reasonable reimbursement for the required examination.

If the governing board requires a physical examination or an examination is required by law as a condition of preemployment, it may cause the required examination to be given. It may, if an applicant is required to take a preemployment physical examination, provide for reasonable reimbursement if the applicant is subsequently employed by the district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45122.1.

(a) In addition to any other prohibition or provision, no person who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony shall be employed by a school district pursuant to this chapter. A school district shall not retain in employment a current classified employee who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, and who is a temporary, substitute, or a probationary employee who has not attained permanent status.

(b) This section applies to any violent or serious offense which, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term “school district” has the same meaning as defined in Section 41302.5.

(d) When the Department of Justice ascertains that an individual who is an applicant for employment by a school district has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, the department shall notify the school district of the criminal information pertaining to the applicant. The notification shall be delivered by telephone and shall be confirmed in writing and delivered to the school district by first-class mail.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a violent of serious felony if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that he or she has been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the school district in which he or she is a resident.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when the Department of Justice notifies a school district by telephone that a current temporary, substitute, or probationary employee who has not attained permanent status, has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, that employee shall immediately be placed on leave without pay. When the school district receives written notification of the fact of conviction from the Department of Justice, the employee shall be terminated automatically and without regard to any other procedure for termination specified in this code or school district procedures unless the employee challenges the record of the Department of Justice and the Department of Justice withdraws in writing its notification to the school district. Upon receipt of written withdrawal of notification from the Department of Justice, the employee shall immediately be reinstated with full restoration of salary and benefits for the period of time from the suspension without pay to the reinstatement.

(h) Notwithstanding Section 47610, this section applies to a charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 589, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

45123.

(a) No person shall be employed or retained in employment by a school district who has been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 44010. A plea or verdict of guilty, a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without jury, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere shall be deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this subdivision.

(b) No person shall be employed or retained in employment by a school district, who has been convicted of a controlled substance offense as defined in Section 44011.

(c) If, however, a conviction is reversed and the person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

(d) The governing board of a school district may employ a person convicted of a controlled substance offense if the governing board of the school district determines, from the evidence presented, that the person has been rehabilitated for at least five years.

The governing board shall determine the type and manner of presentation of the evidence, and the determination of the governing board as to whether or not the person has been rehabilitated is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 596, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

45124.

No person shall be employed or retained in employment by a school district who has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300), Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state. If, however, such determination is reversed and the person is determined not to be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding or the proceeding to determine whether he is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, this section does not prohibit his employment thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45125.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Section 45125.01, the governing board of any school district shall require each person to be employed in a position not requiring certification qualifications, except a secondary school pupil employed in a temporary or part-time position by the governing board of the school district having jurisdiction over the school attended by the pupil, to have two fingerprint cards bearing the legible rolled and flat impressions of the person’s fingerprints together with a personal description of the applicant prepared by a local public law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area of the school district, which agency shall transmit the cards, together with the fee required by subdivision (f), to the Department of Justice; except that any district, or districts with a common board, may process the fingerprint cards if the district so elects.

(2) As used in this section, “local public law enforcement agency” includes any school district and as used in Section 45126 requires the Department of Justice to provide to any school district, upon application, information pertaining only to applicants for employment by the district, including applicants who are employees of another district.

(b) (1) Upon receiving the fingerprint cards, the Department of Justice shall ascertain whether the applicant has been arrested or convicted of any crime insofar as that fact can be ascertained from information available to the department and forward the information to the employing agency submitting the applicant’s fingerprints no more than 15 working days after receiving the fingerprint cards. The Department of Justice shall not forward records of criminal proceedings that did not result in a conviction but shall forward information on arrests pending adjudication.

(2) Upon implementation of an electronic fingerprinting system with terminals located statewide and managed by the Department of Justice, the Department of Justice shall ascertain the information required pursuant to this subdivision within three working days. If the Department of Justice cannot ascertain the information required pursuant to this subdivision within three working days, the department shall notify the school district that it cannot so ascertain the required information. This notification shall be delivered by telephone or electronic mail to the school district. If a school district is notified by the Department of Justice that it cannot ascertain the required information about a person, the school district may not employ that person until the Department of Justice ascertains that information.

(3) In the case of a person to be employed in a position not requiring certification qualifications who is described in subparagraph (A) or (B), the school district shall request the Department of Justice to forward one copy of the fingerprint cards to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining any record of previous convictions of the applicant.

(A) The person has not resided in the State of California for at least one year immediately preceding the person’s application for employment.

(B) The person has resided for more than one year, but less than seven years, in the State of California and the Department of Justice has ascertained that the person was convicted of a sex offense where the victim was a minor or a drug offense where an element of the offense is either the distribution to, or the use of a controlled substance by, a minor.

(c) The governing board of a school district shall not employ a person until the Department of Justice completes its check of the state criminal history file as set forth in this section and Sections 45125.5 and 45126, except that this subdivision does not apply to secondary school pupils who are to be employed in a temporary or part-time position by the governing board of the school district having jurisdiction over the school they attend.
